Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-711
State Wild Game Preserve; typical specimens of wild game animals and birds; collection, preservation, and distribution.

After enclosing the State Wild Game Preserve with a fence, it shall be the duty of the commission to collect, maintain, and perpetuate typical specimens of wild game animals and birds indigenous to the State of Nebraska in its pioneer history, to place the same in charge of a capable caretaker, and to maintain such animals in its discretion as to number, kind, and species, and as to quality of care, to the end that the intentions of section 37-710 may be carried out. The commission shall furnish wild game to public parks of the state whenever the commission has the same on hand available for distribution.

Laws 1927, c. 30, § 2, p. 146;

C.S.1929, § 37-416;

R.S.1943, § 37-416;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-416;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 325.